Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 192.49, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Officersnew text begin and enlisted membersnew text end . Every commissioned officer new text begin and enlisted member new text end of the military forces deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end receive from the state, while engaged in state active service as defined in section 190.05, subdivision 5a, pay and allowances at the rate now or hereafter paid or allowed by law to officersnew text begin or enlisted membersnew text end of the same grade and length of service in the armed forces of the United States, but new text begin basic pay must new text end not new text begin be new text end less than deleted text begin $130 a daydeleted text end new text begin basic pay of an E-5 pay grade according to the military basic pay tables maintained by the federal Defense Finance and Accounting Servicenew text end . Sec. 2. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 192.49, subdivision 2, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-08004 192.49 PAY AND ALLOWANCES OF OFFICERS AND ORGANIZATIONS. Subd. 2. Enlisted persons. When called into state active service by the governor, other than for encampment or maneuvers, including the time necessarily consumed in travel, each enlisted person of the military forces shall be paid by the state the pay and the allowances, when not furnished in kind, provided by law for enlisted persons of similar grade, rating, and length of service in the armed forces of the United States, or $130 a day, whichever is more.